Texas, session 892, HB263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 250, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Section 250.015 to read as follows: Sec. 250.015.  REGULATION OF RECREATIONAL VEHICLE PARKS. (a)  In this section, "recreational vehicle park" has the meaning assigned by Section 13.087, Water Code. (b)  A municipality or county may: (1)  prohibit the formation of a recreational vehicle park; or (2)  if the municipality or county permits the formation of a recreational vehicle park, assess a fee for the formation of the park. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.